Wisconsin, session 2025, SB385.
do enact as follows:SB385,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB385,2,94(1) Veterans housing and recovery program. In the schedule under s. 520.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of veterans affairs under s. 120.485 (2) (rm), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $900,000 2to increase funding for supplies and services costs in the program, and for costs 3associated with leasing a different facility for the Chippewa Falls–based program 4due to space and facility deficiencies of the current location. In the schedule under 5s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of veterans affairs under s. 620.485 (2) (rm), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $1,050,000 7to increase funding for supplies and services costs in the program, and for costs 8associated with leasing a different facility for the Chippewa Falls–based program 9due to space and facility deficiencies of the current location.SB385,2,1010